California statutes. Financial Code
 and continuing education and are qualified to provide financial assistance prior to performing counseling services in this state.

(2) Disburse funds no later than 15 days after receipt of valid funds, or by a scheduled disbursement date, whichever is the greater amount of time.

(3) Transmit funds utilizing electronic payment processing when available.

(4) Implement an inception date policy, which shall include an agreement that a consumer’s first disbursement pursuant to a debt management plan shall be received within 90 days of agreeing to the debt management plan service. The debt management plan shall include all items described in subdivision (h) and shall be provided to the consumer at the inception date of the plan. A description of best practices of the
 organization and of the consumer complaint resources shall be issued no later than the first payment date.

(5) Respond to and research any complaint initiated by a consumer within five business days of receipt of the complaint.

(6) Prohibit a policy requiring debt management plan consumers from being required to utilize additional ancillary services.

(7) Provide consumer access to debt management plan services regardless of the consumer’s ability to pay fees related to the debt management plan, lack of creditor participation, or the amount of the consumer’s outstanding debt.

(8) Implement policies that specifically prohibit credit counselors from receiving financial incentives or additional compensation based on
 the outcome of the counseling process.

(9) Prohibit the practice of paying referral fees to consumers or other third parties that are contingent upon the enrollment of consumers by the organization.

(10) Disclose in all written contracts with consumers the portion of funding for the
 organization that is provided by creditors.

(11) Disclose in all written contracts for debt management plans or debt settlement plans that these plans are not suitable for all consumers and that consumers may request information on other options, including, but not limited to, bankruptcy.

(12) Fully disclose all services to be provided by the organization and any initial and ongoing fees to be charged by the organization for services, including, but
 not limited to, contributions to the organization.

(13) Prohibit the organization or any affiliate of the organization from purchasing debt from a consumer.

(14) Prohibit the
 organization from offering loans to consumers involving the charging of interest.

(15) Prominently disclose in written contracts with consumers of any financial arrangement between the organization and any lender or any provider of financial services if the organization receives any form of compensation for referring consumers to that lender or provider of financial services.

(16) Provide professional liability insurance coverage.

(17) Provide the debtor a written individualized evaluation of the debtor’s financial status and an initial debt management plan for the debtor’s debts with specific recommendations regarding actions the debtor should take.

(18) (A) Provide the debtor enrolling in a debt management plan a written reliable estimate of the length of time it will take to complete the plan that identifies the total debt owed to each creditor included in the plan, the proposed payment to each creditor, and any fees that would be charged for administering the plan.

(B) The estimate required by this paragraph shall be provided before receipt of the debtor’s first deposit.

(o) The nonprofit community service organization provides a copy of the best practices described in subdivision (n) to its debtor, upon request.

(p) The nonprofit community service organization resolves in a prompt and reasonable manner complaints from debtors relating to the organization’s debt management plans or debt settlement plans.

(q) The nonprofit community service organization provides written notice to the commissioner within 30 days of dissolution or termination of engaging in the activities of a prorater, as defined in Section 12002.1.

(r) This
 section shall become inoperative upon the enactment of a statute requiring the licensure and regulation of nonprofit community service organizations providing consumer credit counseling.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 178, Sec. 1.   (SB 985)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Section conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (r).)
-------------------------------------------

12105.

(a) Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any person has engaged or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of this division, or any rule or order promulgated pursuant to this division, the commissioner may, at his or her discretion, bring an action in the name of the people of the State of California in the superior court to enjoin the acts or practices or to enforce compliance. Upon a proper showing, a permanent or preliminary injunction, a regaining order, or a writ of mandate shall be
 granted and a receiver or conservator may be appointed for the defendant’s assets.

(b) If the commissioner determines it is in the public interest, the commissioner may include in any action under this division a claim for ancillary relief, including, but not limited to, a claim for restitution or disgorgement or damages on behalf of the persons injured by the act or practice constituting the subject matter of the action, and the administrative or civil court shall have jurisdiction to award an additional relief.

(c) The commissioner may, after appropriate notice and opportunity for hearing, levy administrative penalties against any person or licensee who violates any provision of this division, or rule or order promulgated pursuant to this division, in an amount not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per violation. Any hearing shall be held in accordance with
 the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner shall have all of the powers granted under this act. If no hearing is requested within 30 days from the date of service of the order, the order shall become final.

(d) Any licensee or person who willfully violates any provision of this division, or any rule or order thereunder, shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation, which shall be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the commissioner in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(e) In any action brought under this division, the commissioner is entitled to receive costs, which in the discretion of the administrative or civil court shall include an amount
 representing reasonable attorney’s fees and any related expenses for services rendered.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 779, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

12106.

(a) The commissioner may do the following, at his or her discretion:

(1) Make public or private investigations within or outside of this state necessary to determine whether any person has violated, or is about to violate, any provision of this division or any rule or order promulgated pursuant to this division, or to aid in the enforcement of the law.

(2) Make public any information concerning any violation of this
 division or any rule or order promulgated pursuant to this division.

(b) For the purpose of any investigation or proceeding under this section, the commissioner or any officer designated by the commissioner may administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements, or other documents or records the commissioner deems relevant or material to the inquiry.

(c) In case of refusal to obey a subpoena issued to a person, the superior court may upon application by the commissioner issue to the person an order requiring the person to appear before the commissioner, or an officer designated by the commissioner, and produce documentary evidence, if so ordered, or to give evidence touching the matter under investigation or in question. Failure to obey the order of
 the court may be punished by the court as a contempt.

(d) No person is excused from attending or testifying, or from producing any document or record, before the commissioner or in obedience of a subpoena of the commissioner, or any officer designated by the commissioner, or in any proceeding instituted by the commissioner, on the ground that the testimony or evidence required of the person may incriminate the person or subject the person to a penalty or forfeiture. However, after validly claiming the privilege against self-incrimination, no individual may be prosecuted or subjected to any penalty or forfeiture for, or on account of, any transaction, matter, or thing for which the person is compelled to testify or produce pursuant to this section, except that the individual testifying is not exempt from prosecution and punishment for perjury or contempt committed in testifying.

(e) The cost of any review, examination, audit, or investigation made by the commissioner under this section shall be paid to the commissioner by the person subject to the review, examination, audit, or investigation, and the commissioner may maintain an action for the recovery of these costs in any court of competent jurisdiction. In determining the cost, the commissioner may use the actual amount of the salary or other compensation paid to the persons making the review, examination, audit, or investigation plus the actual amount of expenses, including overhead reasonably incurred in the performance of the work.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 779, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

12107.

(a) If, upon inspection or investigation, based upon a complaint or otherwise, the department has cause to believe that a person is engaged in business without a license, or a person or licensee is violating any provision of this division or any rule or order promulgated pursuant to this division, the department may issue a citation to that person in writing describing with particularity the basis of the citation. Each citation may contain an order to desist and refrain and an assessment of an administrative penalty not to exceed two thousand
 five hundred dollars ($2,500). All penalties collected under this section shall be deposited in the State Corporations Fund.

(b) The sanctions authorized under this section shall be separate from, and in addition to, all other administrative, civil, or criminal remedies.

(c) If within 30 days from the receipt of the citation, the person cited fails to notify the department that the person intends to request a hearing as described in subdivision (d), the citation shall be deemed final.

(d) Any hearing under this section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(e) After the exhaustion of the review procedures provided for in this section, the department may
 apply to the appropriate superior court for a judgment in the amount of the administrative penalty and order compelling the cited person to comply with the order of the department. The application shall include a certified copy of the final order of the department and shall constitute a sufficient showing to warrant the issuance of the judgment and order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 779, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

12108.

(a) The remedies available to the commissioner pursuant to this division are not exclusive and may be sought and employed in any combination deemed advisable by the commissioner to enforce the provisions of this division.

(b) Any amounts collected by the commissioner in any action shall be paid into the State Corporations Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 779, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Licensing [12200. - 12225.]

12200.

No person shall engage in the business, for compensation, of selling checks, drafts, money orders, or other commercial paper serving the same purpose, or of receiving money as agent of an obligor for the purpose of paying bills, invoices, or accounts of such obligor, or acting as a prorater, nor shall any person, without direct compensation and not as an authorized agent for a utility company, accept money for the purpose of forwarding it to others in payment of utility bills, without first obtaining a license from the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 660, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

12200.2.

A license as a business agent or special prorater may be issued to an individual.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 367.)
-------------------------------------------

12200.5.

The commissioner shall classify and license applicants for a proraters license in accordance with the nature of their existing or proposed business and the extent of regulation required thereby in the public interest as follows:

(a) A special proraters license shall be issued to a qualified applicant to engage in business as a business agent.

(b) A general proraters license shall be issued to all other qualified applicants.

Whenever the term “prorater” is used in this division with reference to a
 licensee it shall be deemed to mean a general prorater unless otherwise provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

12201.

(a) An application for a license shall be in writing, under oath, and in a form prescribed by the commissioner and shall contain the name, and the address both of the residence and place of business, of the applicant and if the applicant is a partnership or association, of every member thereof, and if a corporation, of every officer and director thereof.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the commissioner may by rule or order prescribe circumstances under which to accept electronic records or electronic signatures. This section does not require the commissioner to accept electronic records or electronic signatures.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Electronic record” means an initial license application, or material modification of that license application, and any other record created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored by electronic means. “Electronic record” also includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) An application, amendment, supplement, and exhibit, filed for any license, consent, or other authority.

(B) A financial statement, report, or advertising.

(C) An order, license, consent, or other authority.

(D) A notice of public hearing, accusation, and statement of issues in connection with any application, license, consent, or other authority.

(E) A proposed decision of a hearing officer and a decision of the commissioner.

(F) The transcripts of a hearing.

(G) A release, newsletter, interpretive opinion, determination, or specific ruling.

(H) Correspondence between a party and the commissioner directly relating to any document listed in subparagraphs (A) to (G), inclusive.

(2) “Electronic signature” means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with an electronic record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the electronic record.

(d) The Legislature finds and declares that the Department of Financial Protection
 and Innovation has continuously implemented methods to accept records filed electronically, and is encouraged to continue to expand its use of electronic filings to the extent feasible, as budget, resources, and equipment are made available to accomplish that goal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 113.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

12202.

If the business is to be conducted at a specific address or addresses, the address or addresses at which the business is to be conducted shall be included in the application.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------

12203.

If the business is to be conducted from a mobile unit, the California state registration number or other identification of such mobile unit and the area in which the applicant proposes to operate such mobile unit shall be included in the application.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------

12204.

The application shall specify the type of business for which a license is requested and shall also contain such other information as the commissioner may reasonably require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 807.)
-------------------------------------------

12205.

(a) A licensed bill payer, general prorater, or special prorater who does not qualify to make use of agencies in the conduct of its business at all times shall maintain a surety bond in an amount as required by subdivision (a) of Section 12206 and assets of at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in excess of its liabilities, of which assets at least five thousand dollars ($5,000) shall be liquid assets. A licensed bill payer, general prorater, or special prorater is qualified to make use of agencies in the conduct of its business if at all
 times it shall have capital of at least one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) and maintain a surety bond in an amount as required by subdivision (a) of Section 12206 and assets, excluding goodwill and other intangible assets, of at least one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in excess of its liabilities, of which assets at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) shall be liquid assets.

(b) A licensed check seller, whether or not qualified to make use of agencies in the conduct of its business, shall at all times have capital of at least five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) and maintain a surety bond in an amount as required by subdivision (b) of Section 12206 and assets, excluding goodwill and other intangible assets, of at least five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in excess of its liabilities, of which assets at least one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) are liquid assets. In the alternative, a licensed check seller
 may satisfy the assets and surety bond requirements of this subdivision by assets, excluding goodwill and other intangible assets, of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000) in excess of liabilities, of which assets at least one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) are liquid assets, and a surety bond, approved by the commissioner, in an amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(c) The commissioner may determine by rule or order what assets are liquid assets within the meaning of this section and may determine by specific ruling that a particular asset is or is not a liquid asset within the meaning of this section.

(d) The commissioner may by order increase the net asset and liquid asset requirements of subdivision (b) for any licensed check seller when, as a result of any examination or report under Section 12307.3, it appears to the commissioner that it is
 necessary for the safety and soundness of that licensed check seller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 869, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

12206.

(a) If the applicant is to engage in the business of receiving money for the purpose of paying bills, invoices or accounts of an obligor, the applicant shall file with the commissioner concurrently with its application for a license, a surety bond to be approved by the commissioner, in which the applicant is the principal, in the minimum amount of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). A deposit given instead of the bond required by this section shall not be deemed an asset of the applicant or licensee for the purpose of complying with
 Section 12205.

(b) If the applicant is to engage in the business of check selling, the applicant shall file with the commissioner concurrently with its application for a license, a surety bond to be approved by the commissioner, in which the applicant is the principal, in the minimum amount of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000). A deposit given instead of the bond required by this section shall not be deemed an asset of the applicant or licensee for the purpose of complying with Section 12205.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 869, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

12207.

The bond shall be approved by the commissioner. The bond shall run to the state for the use of the state and of any person who has a cause of action against the principal under the provisions of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 212.)
-------------------------------------------

12208.

The bond shall be conditioned that the obligor will faithfully conform to and abide by the provisions of this division and of all rules and regulations made by the commissioner pursuant to this division, and will honestly and faithfully apply all funds received and will faithfully and honestly perform all obligations and undertakings under this division, and will pay to the State and to any person all money that becomes due and owing to the State or to such person from the obligor under the provisions of this division. The surety under such bond may pay the full amount of its liability thereunder to a receiver appointed by a superior court pursuant to Section 12307.2 of
 this code in lieu of payment to the State or persons having a cause of action against the obligor of the bond, and upon such payment the surety is completely released from further liability under such bond.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 186.)
-------------------------------------------

12209.

The bond shall remain in force and effect until the surety is released from liability by the commissioner, or until the bond is canceled by the surety.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------

12212.

No action may be brought on the bond by any person after the expiration of two years from the time when the act or default complained of occurred.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------

12213.

When an action is commenced on the bond of a licensee the commissioner may require the filing of a new bond, and immediately upon the recovery of any action on the bond the licensee shall file a new bond. Failure to file a new bond within 10 days of the recovery on a bond, or within 10 days after notification that a bond is required, constitutes sufficient grounds for the suspension or revocation of a license.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------

12214.

(a) An applicant at the time of filing an application for a license under this division shall pay to the commissioner the sum of fifty dollars ($50) as a fee for investigating the application and two hundred dollars ($200) as an application fee. The investigation fee and application fee are not refundable if an application is denied or withdrawn.

(b) (1) Each licensee shall pay to the commissioner its pro rata share of all costs and expenses, reasonably incurred in the administration of this division as estimated by the commissioner for the ensuing
 year and any deficit actually incurred or anticipated in the administration of the programs in the year in which such assessment is made. The pro rata share shall be the proportion which a licensee’s gross income bears to the aggregate gross income of all licensees as shown by the annual financial reports to the commissioner. The pro rata share shall not include the costs of any examinations provided for in Section 12306, unless they cannot be collected from the licensee examined.

(2) On or before the 30th day of May in each year, the commissioner shall notify each licensee by mail of the amount assessed and levied against it and that amount shall be paid within 20 days thereafter. If payment is not made within 20 days, the commissioner shall assess and collect a penalty in addition to the assessment, of 1 percent of the assessment for each month or part of a month that the payment is delayed or withheld.

(3) In the levying and collection of the assessment, a licensee shall not be assessed for nor be permitted to pay less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per year.

(4) If a licensee fails to pay the assessment on or before the 30th day of June following the day upon which payment is due, the commissioner may by order summarily suspend or revoke the certificate issued to such licensee. If, after such an order is made, a request for hearing is filed in writing and a hearing is not held within 60 days thereafter, the order is deemed rescinded as of its effective date. During any period when its certificate is revoked or suspended, a licensee shall not conduct business pursuant to this division except as may be permitted by order of the commissioner; provided, however, that the revocation, suspension or surrender of a certificate shall not affect the powers of the commissioner as
 provided in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 497, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12216.

(a) Upon the filing of the application and the payment of the fees and the approval of the bond, the commissioner shall investigate and examine the following:

(1) The background and experience of the applicant and of the partners or members thereof if the applicant is a partnership or association, and of the officers and directors thereof if the applicant is a corporation, and of any organizers, incorporators, managers, or stockholders.

(2) The plan of business of the applicant. The plan of business should include, but not be limited to: (A) a feasibility and market study; (B) pro forma financial statements, including all underlying assumptions; (C) a description of the geographical area to be served by agents; (D) a description of the accounting system to be used; (E) a description of the internal control procedures for the operations of the proposed business, and for its agents; and (F) plans for future expansion of business operations.

(3) Any other factors and circumstances bearing on the applicant or any proposed facility that in the opinion of the commissioner may be relevant.

(b) If the commissioner determines that
 the applicant has satisfied the provisions of this division and does not find facts constituting reasons for denial as specified in Section 12221, the commissioner shall issue and deliver a license to the applicant to engage in business in accordance with the provisions of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 869, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

12217.

Each license shall state the following:

(a) The name of the licensee, and if the licensee is a partnership or association the names of the members, or if the licensee is a corporation the date and place of its incorporation.

(b) The address at which such business is to be conducted.

(c) The type of business licensed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 642.)
-------------------------------------------

12218.

The license shall be kept conspicuously posted in the principal place of business of the licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 339.)
-------------------------------------------

12219.

The license is not transferable or assignable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------

12220.

The commissioner may by regulation require licensees to file at such times as he may specify such information as the commissioner may reasonably require regarding any changes in the information provided in any application filed pursuant to this division.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 869.)
-------------------------------------------

12221.

Upon reasonable notice and opportunity to be heard, the commissioner may deny the application for the license for any of the following reasons:

(a) A false statement of a material fact has been made in the application for license.

(b) Any officer, director, or member of the applicant has, within the last 10 years, been (1) convicted of or pleaded nolo contendere to a crime, or (2) committed any act involving dishonesty, fraud, or
 deceit, which crime or act is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a person engaged in business in accordance with the provisions of this division.

(c) The applicant, any officer, director, general partner, or member of the applicant, or any person owning or controlling, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the outstanding interests or equity securities of the applicant has violated any provision of this division or the rules thereunder or any similar regulatory scheme of the State of California or a foreign jurisdiction.

(d) The applicant has not complied with all the applicable provisions of this division.

(e) The proposed officers and directors do not have sufficient check selling, bill paying, prorating, or other experience to afford reasonable promise of successful
 operation.

(f) The plan of business does not demonstrate that the proposed business will have a reasonable chance for a successful operation.

(g) The proposed business is being formed for a purpose other than the legitimate objectives contemplated by this division.

(h) The proposed capital structure is inadequate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 473, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

12223.

The commissioner may require a licensee, in addition to the bond provided in Section 12206, to obtain an adequate fidelity bond for each officer, employee, agent, or any person having access to funds collected by or for the licensee or having authority to draw against such funds if in the commissioner’s opinion such a bond is necessary for the protection of the public. The bond shall be for the protection of the public against loss suffered through embezzlement by any person having access to funds collected by or for the licensee or having authority to draw against such funds, or from mysterious disappearance, theft, holdup or burglary. A deposit given
 instead of the bond required by this section shall not be deemed an asset of the licensee for the purpose of complying with Section 12205.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 215.)
-------------------------------------------

12225.

The commissioner may issue a duplicate of a license that has been lost, stolen, or destroyed, or for a certificate which the licensee desires to replace, upon satisfactory proof of such loss, theft, or destruction, or upon surrender of a certificate for replacement and the payment of a fee of two dollars ($2).

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 339.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Licensee Regulations [12300. - 12332.]

12300.

The commissioner may make general rules and regulations and specific rulings, demands, and findings for the enforcement of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------

12300.1.

Licensees shall observe reasonable precautions against theft or alteration of checks, drafts or money orders, and against burglary or holdup.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1817.)
-------------------------------------------

12300.2.

Every person engaging in the business of a check seller shall conduct the business under his or her true name unless he or she has complied with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17900) of Part 3 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 660, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

12300.3.

All funds received by a licensee or its agents from the sale of checks, drafts, money orders, or other commercial paper serving the same purpose and for the purpose of paying bills, invoices, or accounts of an obligor, equal in amount to the face value of such instruments or equal to the amount to be paid, shall constitute trust funds owned by and belonging to the person from whom they were received or a licensee who has paid the checks, drafts, money orders or other commercial paper serving the same purpose, for which the funds of such persons have been received by the agent but not transmitted to such licensee or deposited in the trust account of such licensee. If a
 licensee or an agent of a licensee shall commingle such funds with those of his own, all assets of such agent shall be impressed with a trust in favor of said purchaser or the licensee in an amount equal to the aggregate funds received or which should have been received by the agent from such sale. Such trust shall continue until an amount equal to said funds is separated from those of the agent and transmitted to the licensee or deposited in the trust account of licensee. An amount equal to all such trust funds shall be deposited in a bank or banks in an account or accounts in the name of the licensee designated “trust account,” or by some other appropriate name indicating that the funds are not the funds of the licensee or of its officers, employees, or agents. Such funds, or, in the event of commingling of such funds by licensee or its agent with those of the licensee or its agent, an amount of funds of such licensee or of its agent equal thereto, shall constitute trust funds as herein provided and shall
 not be subject to attachment, levy of execution or sequestration by order of court except by a payee, or bona fide assignee, or bona fide holder in due course of a check, draft, or money order sold by a licensee, or except by an obligor for whom a licensee is acting as an agent in paying bills. Funds in said account, together with funds and checks on hand and in the hands of agents held for the account of the licensee, at all times shall be at least equal to the aggregate liablity of the licensee on account of checks sold and bills, invoices, and accounts accepted for payment.

Upon request of the commissioner, a licensee shall furnish to the commissioner an authorization for examination of financial records of any such trust fund account, maintained in a financial institution, in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 7473 of the Government Code.

Nothing in this law shall be construed to prevent a purchaser, a
 holder in due course, the payee of a check, draft or money order sold by the licensee in the usual course of his business, or an obligor for whom the licensee is acting as an agent in paying bills of the obligor, from taking any legal action necessary to enforce any claims which said purchaser, holder in due course, payee, or obligor may desire to take including the right to levy attachment or execution.

In the event a license under this law shall be suspended or terminated the licensee shall immediately deposit in said trust account an amount which with funds therein contained shall be equal to the outstanding checks sold and bills unpaid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1320.)
-------------------------------------------

12300.4.

Prior to such separation and transmittal to the licensee or deposit by its agent such funds received by said agent may be used by said agent for the sole purpose only of the making of change or cashing of checks in the normal course of its business. All such funds received by said agent to the date of deposit or transmittal as required below or an amount equal to such funds must be separated from those of the agent and transmitted to, or deposited in the trust account of, the licensee not less than every third business day. If an agent owns or operates, either directly or indirectly, more than two locations for the sale of checks, drafts, money orders, or other commercial
 paper serving the same purpose and/or for the receipt of money for the purpose of paying bills, invoices or accounts of an obligor, and handles trust funds in any three-day period equal to or in excess of securities to be deposited as provided in Section 12223, said agent shall transmit to, or deposit in the trust account of, the licensee directly from each such location of such agent such funds not later than the end of the next business day following receipt; such funds to be in form of cash or checks cashed in the normal course of business only.

Where the total amount of such funds held by an agent does not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) in a calendar week, the commissioner may, in his discretion, by written order permit the agent to transmit or deposit such funds in periods in excess of 3 days but not more than 10 days.

If, after reasonable notice from licensee, an agent shall fail to transmit or deposit the
 funds, or an amount equal thereto, or to report to the licensee, as herein provided without just cause, or if an agent shall use any of such funds, directly or indirectly, for any purpose other than is permitted herein, licensee shall immediately terminate such agency and within five (5) days thereafter notify the commissioner in writing of the reason for such termination, setting forth the name and address of the agency location. No agent so terminated shall be permitted to become an agent of the licensee or any other licensee except as provided in Section 12301.4 of the Financial Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1817.)
-------------------------------------------

12300.5.

An amount equal to all such funds received by a licensee shall be separated from the funds of the licensee and deposited in its trust account not later than the end of the next business day following receipt by such licensee. All such funds shall thereafter remain in such trust account and may be used for no purpose other than paying bills of said persons, or paying checks, drafts, money orders, or other commercial paper sold by the licensee except as otherwise provided in Section 12300.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1817.)
-------------------------------------------

12300.6.

Prior to separation and deposit by the licensee such funds may only be used by the licensee for the making of change or the cashing of checks in the normal course of its business, and then only to the extent of the amount of the bond which has been filed under Section 12206.

After separation and deposit such funds also may be used by a licensee for the cashing of checks in the normal course of its business, and then only to the extent of the amount of the bond which has been filed with the commissioner containing the provisions and conditions set forth in Sections 12207 through 12213, inclusive, of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1817.)
-------------------------------------------

12301.

A licensee may establish branch offices or agencies if it is qualified under the provisions of Section 12205 and if it expressly assumes responsibility for the acts of any person selling checks, drafts, or money orders for the licensee or accepting money in its name or on its behalf at such place of business. There shall be posted in a prominent place in each branch office or agency a sign stating that the place of business is a branch office or agency of the licensee. The licensee is responsible for the acts of any person selling checks, drafts, or money orders or accepting money in its name or on its behalf.